Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.670

Leave sharing program—Adoption of rules.

The office of financial management and other personnel authorities shall each adopt rules applicable to employees under their respective jurisdictions: (1) Establishing appropriate parameters for the program which are consistent with the provisions of RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.665; (2) providing for equivalent treatment of employees between their respective jurisdictions and allowing transfers of leave in accordance with RCW 41.04.665(5); (3) establishing procedures to ensure that the program does not significantly increase the cost of providing leave; and (4) providing for the administration of the program and providing for maintenance and collection of sufficient information on the program to allow a thorough legislative review.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 436; 1993 c 281 s 18; 1990 c 23 s 3; 1989 c 93 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.

Temporary policies—1989 c 93: "School districts, the department of personnel, the higher education personnel board, and other personnel authorities may adopt temporary emergency policies and procedures to implement the program on April 20, 1989, so that donated leave may be used in lieu of leave without pay taken after April 20, 1989." [ 1989 c 93 s 7.]

Severability—1989 c 93: See note following RCW 41.04.650.